Mississippi statutes. Title 71. Labor and Industry
Article 7. Contributions.
§ 71-5-357.
Regulations governing nonprofit organizations [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

Benefits paid to employees of nonprofit organizations shall be financed in accordance with the provisions of this section. For the purpose of this section, a nonprofit organization is an organization (or group of organizations) described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 which is exempt from income tax under Section 501(a) of such code (26 USCS Section 501).

Any nonprofit organization which, under Section 71-5-11, subsection H(3), is or becomes subject to this chapter shall pay contributions under the provisions of Sections 71-5-351 through 71-5-355 unless it elects, in accordance with this paragraph, to pay to the department for the unemployment fund an amount equal to the amount of regular benefits and one-half (1/2) of the extended benefits paid, that is attributable to service in the employ of such nonprofit organization, to individuals for weeks of unemployment which begin during the effective period of such election.

Any nonprofit organization which becomes subject to this chapter may elect to become liable for payments in lieu of contributions for a period of not less than twelve (12) months, beginning with the date on which such subjectivity begins, by filing a written notice of its election with the department not later than thirty (30) days immediately following the date of the determination of such subjectivity.

Any nonprofit organization which makes an election in accordance with subparagraph (i) of this paragraph will continue to be liable for payments in lieu of contributions unless it files with the department a written termination notice not later than thirty (30) days prior to the beginning of the tax year for which such termination shall first be effective.

Any nonprofit organization which has been paying contributions under this chapter may change to a reimbursable basis by filing with the department, not later than thirty (30) days prior to the beginning of any tax year, a written notice of election to become liable for payments in lieu of contributions. Such election shall not be terminable by the organization for that and the next tax year.

The department may for good cause extend the period within which a notice of election or a notice of termination must be filed, and may permit an election to be retroactive.

The department, in accordance with such regulations as it may prescribe, shall notify each nonprofit organization of any determination which it may make of its status as an employer, of the effective date of any election which it makes and of any termination of such election. Such determinations shall be subject to reconsideration, appeal and review in accordance with the provisions of Sections 71-5-351 through 71-5-355.

Payments in lieu of contributions shall be made in accordance with the provisions of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.

At the end of each calendar quarter, or at the end of any other period as determined by the department, the department shall bill each nonprofit organization (or group of such organizations) which has elected to make payments in lieu of contributions, for an amount equal to the full amount of regular benefits plus one-half (1/2) of the amount of extended benefits paid during such quarter or other prescribed period that is attributable to service in the employ of such organization.

Payment of any bill rendered under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph shall be made not later than forty-five (45) days after such bill was delivered to the nonprofit organization, unless there has been an application for review and redetermination in accordance with subparagraph (v) of this paragraph.

1. All of the enforcement procedures for the collection of delinquent contributions contained in Sections 71-5-363 through 71-5-383 shall be applicable in all respects for the collection of delinquent payments due by nonprofit organizations who have elected to become liable for payments in lieu of contributions.

2. If any nonprofit organization is delinquent in making payments in lieu of contributions, the department may terminate such organization’s election to make payments in lieu of contributions as of the beginning of the next tax year, and such termination shall be effective for the balance of such tax year.

Payments made by any nonprofit organization under the provisions of this paragraph shall not be deducted or deductible, in whole or in part, from the remuneration of individuals in the employ of the organization.

Payments due by employers who elect to reimburse the fund in lieu of contributions as provided in this paragraph may not be noncharged under any condition. The reimbursement must be on a dollar-for-dollar basis (One Dollar ($1.00) reimbursement for each dollar paid in benefits) in every case, so that the trust fund shall be reimbursed in full, such reimbursement to include, but not be limited to, benefits or payments erroneously or incorrectly paid, or paid as a result of a determination of eligibility which is subsequently reversed, or paid as a result of claimant fraud. However, political subdivisions who are reimbursing employers may elect to pay to the fund an amount equal to five-tenths percent (.5%) through December 31, 2010, and shall pay twenty-five one-hundredths percent (.25%) thereafter of the taxable wages paid during the calendar year with respect to employment, and those employers who so elect shall be relieved of liability for reimbursement of benefits paid under the same conditions that benefits are not charged to the experience-rating record of a contributing employer as provided in Section 71-5-355(2)(b)(ii) other than Clause 5 thereof. Benefits paid in such circumstances for which reimbursing employers are relieved of liability for reimbursement shall not be considered attributable to service in the employment of such reimbursing employer.

The amount due specified in any bill from the department shall be conclusive on the organization unless, not later than fifteen (15) days after the bill was delivered to it, the organization files an application for redetermination by the department, setting forth the grounds for such application or appeal. The department shall promptly review and reconsider the amount due specified in the bill and shall thereafter issue a redetermination in any case in which such application for redetermination has been filed. Any such redetermination shall be conclusive on the organization unless, not later than fifteen (15) days after the redetermination was delivered to it, the organization files an appeal to the Circuit Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, in accordance with the provisions of law with respect to review of civil causes by certiorari.

Past-due payments of amounts in lieu of contributions shall be subject to the same interest and penalties that, pursuant to Section 71-5-363, apply to past-due contributions.

Each employer that is liable for payments in lieu of contributions shall pay to the department for the fund the amount of regular benefits plus the amount of one-half (1/2) of extended benefits paid are attributable to service in the employ of such employer. If benefits paid to an individual are based on wages paid by more than one (1) employer and one or more of such employers are liable for payments in lieu of contributions, the amount payable to the fund by each employer that is liable for such payments shall be determined in accordance with the provisions of subparagraph (i) or subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph.

If benefits paid to an individual are based on wages paid by one or more employers that are liable for payment in lieu of contributions and on wages paid by one or more employers who are liable for contributions, the amount of benefits payable by each employer that is liable for payments in lieu of contributions shall be an amount which bears the same ratio to the total benefits paid to the individual as the total base period wages paid to the individual by such employer bear to the total base period wages paid to the individual by all of his base period employers.

If benefits paid to an individual are based on wages paid by two (2) or more employers that are liable for payments in lieu of contributions, the amount of benefits payable by each such employer shall be an amount which bears the same ratio to the total benefits paid to the individual as the total base period wages paid to the individual by such employer bear to the total base period wages paid to the individual by all of his base period employers.

In the discretion of the department, any nonprofit organization that elects to become liable for payments in lieu of contributions shall be required to execute and file with the department a surety bond approved by the department, or it may elect instead to deposit with the department money or securities. The amount of such bond or deposit shall be determined in accordance with the provisions of this paragraph.

The amount of the bond or deposit required by paragraph (d) shall be equal to two and seven-tenths percent (2.7%) thereafter to December 31, 2010, and one and thirty-five one-hundredths percent (1.35%) thereafter, of the organization’s taxable wages paid for employment as defined in Section 71-5-11, subsection I(4), for the four (4) calendar quarters immediately preceding the effective date of the election, the renewal date in the case of a bond, or the biennial anniversary of the effective date of election in the case of a deposit of money or securities, whichever date shall be most recent and applicable. If the nonprofit organization did not pay wages in each of such four (4) calendar quarters, the amount of the bond or deposit shall be as determined by the department.

Any bond deposited under paragraph (d) shall be in force for a period of not less than two (2) tax years and shall be renewed with the approval of the department at such times as the department may prescribe, but not less frequently than at intervals of two (2) years as long as the organization continues to be liable for payments in lieu of contributions. The department shall require adjustments to be made in a previously filed bond as it deems appropriate. If the bond is to be increased, the adjusted bond shall be filed by the organization within thirty (30) days of the date notice of the required adjustment was delivered to it. Failure by any organization covered by such bond to pay the full amount of payments in lieu of contributions when due, together with any applicable interest and penalties provided in paragraph (b)(v) of this section, shall render the surety liable on the bond to the extent of the bond, as though the surety was such organization.

Any deposit of money or securities in accordance with paragraph (d) shall be retained by the department in an escrow account until liability under the election is terminated, at which time it shall be returned to the organization, less any deductions as hereinafter provided. The department may deduct from the money deposited under paragraph (d) by a nonprofit organization, or sell the securities it has so deposited, to the extent necessary to satisfy any due and unpaid payments in lieu of contributions and any applicable interest and penalties provided for in paragraph (b)(v) of this section. The department shall require the organization, within thirty (30) days following any deduction from a money deposit or sale of deposited securities under the provisions hereof, to deposit sufficient additional money or securities to make whole the organization’s deposit at the prior level. Any cash remaining from the sale of such securities shall be a part of the organization’s escrow account. The department may, at any time, review the adequacy of the deposit made by any organization. If, as a result of such review, it determines that an adjustment is necessary, it shall require the organization to make additional deposit within thirty (30) days of notice of its determination or shall return to it such portion of the deposit as it no longer considers necessary, whichever action is appropriate. Disposition of income from securities held in escrow shall be governed by the applicable provisions of the state law.

If any nonprofit organization fails to file a bond or make a deposit, or to file a bond in an increased amount, or to increase or make whole the amount of a previously made deposit as provided under this subparagraph, the department may terminate such organization’s election to make payments in lieu of contributions, and such termination shall continue for not less than the four (4) consecutive calendar-quarter periods beginning with the quarter in which such termination becomes effective; however, the department may extend for good cause the applicable filing, deposit or adjustment period by not more than thirty (30) days.

Group account shall be established according to regulations prescribed by the department.

Any employer which elects to make payments in lieu of contributions into the Unemployment Compensation Fund as provided in this paragraph shall not be liable to make such payments with respect to the benefits paid to any individual whose base period wages include wages for previously uncovered services as defined in Section 71-5-511(e) to the extent that the Unemployment Compensation Fund is reimbursed for such benefits pursuant to Section 121 of Public Law 94-566.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7392.3; Laws, 1971, ch. 519, § 16; Laws, 1977, ch. 497, § 4; Laws, 1978, ch. 339, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 480, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 361; Laws, 1998, ch. 331, § 5; Laws, 2002, ch. 562, § 2; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 34; Laws, 2007, ch. 606, § 9; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 34; Laws, 2010, ch. 504, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 33; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 34; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 34; Laws, 2013, ch. 309, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved March 6, 2013); reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 34, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§ 71-5-359.
Regulations governing state boards, instrumentalities, and political subdivisions [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

The Department of Finance and Administration shall, in the manner provided in subsection (3) of this section, pay, upon notice issued by the department, to the department for the Unemployment Compensation Fund an amount equal to the regular benefits and one-half (1/2) of the extended benefits paid that are attributable to service in the employ of a state agency. The amount required to be reimbursed by a certain agency shall be billed to the Department of Finance and Administration and shall be paid from the Employment Compensation Revolving Fund pursuant to subsection (3) of this section not later than thirty (30) days after such bill was sent, unless there has been an application for review and redetermination in accordance with Section 71-5-357(b)(v).

The Department of Finance and Administration shall, in the manner provided in subsection (3) of this section, pay, upon a notice issued by the department, to the department for the Unemployment Compensation Fund an amount equal to the regular benefits and the extended benefits paid that are attributable to service in the employ of a state agency. The amount required to be reimbursed by a certain agency shall be billed to the Department of Finance and Administration and shall be paid from the Employment Compensation Revolving Fund pursuant to subsection (3) of this section not later than thirty (30) days after such bill was sent, unless there has been an application for review and redetermination in accordance with Section 71-5-357(b)(v).

Each agency of state government shall deposit monthly for a period of twenty-four (24) months an amount equal to one-twelfth of one percent (1/12 of 1%) of the first Six Thousand Dollars ($6,000.00) paid to each employee thereof during the next preceding year into the Employment Compensation Revolving Fund that is created in the State Treasury. The Department of Finance and Administration shall determine the percentage to be applied to the amount of covered wages paid in order to maintain a balance in the revolving fund of not less than the amount determined by an actuary through an annual actuarial evaluation. The State Treasurer shall invest all funds in the Employment Compensation Revolving Fund and all interest earned shall be credited to the Employment Compensation Revolving Fund.

The reimbursement of benefits paid by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security shall be paid by the Department of Finance and Administration from the Employment Compensation Revolving Fund upon notice from the department; and the Department of Finance and Administration shall issue warrants or may contract for the performance of the duties prescribed by subsections (2) and (3) of this section, and other duties necessarily related thereto.

Any political subdivision of this state shall pay to the department for the unemployment compensation fund an amount equal to the regular benefits and the extended benefits paid that are attributable to service in the employ of such political subdivision unless it elects to make contributions to the unemployment fund as provided in subsection (9) of this section. The amount required to be reimbursed shall be billed and shall be paid as provided in Section 71-5-357, with respect to similar payments for nonprofit organizations.

Each political subdivision, unless it elects to make contributions to the unemployment compensation fund as provided in subsection (9) of this section, shall establish a revolving fund and deposit an amount equal to two percent (2%) of the first Six Thousand Dollars ($6,000.00) paid to each employee thereof during the next preceding year. However, the department shall by regulation establish a procedure to allow reimbursing political subdivisions to elect to maintain the balance in the revolving fund as required under this paragraph or to annually execute a surety bond to be approved by the department in an amount not less than two percent (2%) of the covered wages paid during the next preceding year.

In the event any political subdivision becomes delinquent in payments due under this chapter, upon due notice, and upon certification of the delinquency by the department to the Department of Finance and Administration, the Department of Revenue, the Department of Environmental Quality and the Department of Insurance, or any of them, or any other agencies of the State of Mississippi that may be indebted to such delinquent political subdivision, such agencies shall direct the issuance of warrants which in the aggregate shall be the amount of such delinquency payable to the department and drawn upon any funds in the State Treasury which may be available to such political subdivision in satisfaction of any such delinquency. This remedy shall be in addition to any other collection remedies in this chapter or otherwise provided by law.

Payments made by any political subdivision under the provisions of this section shall not be deducted or deductible, in whole or in part, from the remuneration of individuals in the employ of the organization.

Any governmental entity shall not be liable to make payments to the unemployment fund with respect to the benefits paid to any individual whose base period wages include wages for previously uncovered services as defined in Section 71-5-511, subsection (e), to the extent that the Unemployment Compensation Fund is reimbursed for such benefits pursuant to Section 121 of Public Law 94-566.

Any political subdivision of this state may elect to make contributions to the unemployment fund instead of making reimbursement for benefits paid as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section. A political subdivision which makes this election shall so notify the department, not later than three (3) months after it is officially organized or is otherwise established, and shall be subject to the provisions of Section 71-5-351, with regard to the payment of contributions. A political subdivision which makes this election shall pay contributions equal to two percent (2%) of taxable wages through calendar year 2010, and one percent (1%) of taxable wages thereafter paid by it during each calendar quarter it is subject to this chapter. The department shall by regulation establish a procedure to allow political subdivisions the option periodically to elect either the reimbursement or the contribution method of financing unemployment compensation coverage.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7392.5; Laws, 1971, ch. 519, § 17; Laws, 1977, ch. 497, § 5; Laws, 1978, ch. 340, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 274; Laws, 1986, ch. 320; Laws, 1993, ch. 353, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 397, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 507, § 3; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 35; Laws, 2007, ch. 556, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 606, § 10; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 35; Laws, 2010, ch. 504, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 34; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 35; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 35, eff from and after July 1, 2012; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 35, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§ 71-5-361.
Period, election, and termination.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, any employing unit which is or becomes an employer subject to this chapter within any calendar year shall be deemed to be an employer during the whole of such calendar year.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section:

An employing unit (other than a state hospital, state institution of higher learning, state or state agency or other political subdivision or instrumentality) except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this subsection, shall cease to be an employer subject to this chapter only as of the first day of January of any calendar year, only if it files with the department on or before the thirty-first day of May of such year a written application for termination of coverage, and the department finds that during the preceding calendar year the employing unit did not pay wages of One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) or more in any calendar quarter and that there were no twenty (20) days, each day being in a different week within the preceding calendar year, within which such employing unit employed one or more individuals in employment subject to this chapter, or four (4) or more in the case of nonprofit organizations, except if the department finds that throughout a calendar year an employer has had no employment, it shall cease to be an employer subject to this chapter.

An agricultural employer as defined under Section 71-5-11, subsection H(4)(a) shall cease to be an agricultural employer subject to this chapter only as of the first day of January of any calendar year, only if it files with the department on or before the thirty-first day of May of such year a written application for termination of coverage, and the department finds that during the preceding calendar year the employing unit did not pay for agricultural employment wages as defined in Section 71-5-11, subsection I(6) of Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00) in any calendar quarter of the preceding calendar year and that there were no twenty (20) days, each day being in a different week, within such calendar year, within which such employing unit employed ten (10) or more individuals in employment subject to this chapter, except if the department finds that throughout a calendar year an employer has had no employment, it shall cease to be an employer subject to this chapter.

A domestic employer, as defined in Section 71-5-11, subsection H(4)(b), shall cease to be an employer subject to this chapter only as of the first day of January of any calendar year, only if it files with the department on or before the thirty-first day of May of such year a written application for termination of coverage, and the department finds that during the preceding calendar year the employing unit did not pay wages for domestic employment of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or more in any calendar quarter of the preceding calendar year, except if the department finds that throughout a calendar year an employer has had no employment, it shall cease to be an employer subject to this chapter.

For the purpose of this subsection, the two (2) or more employing units mentioned in Section 71-5-11, subsection H(5) or (6), shall be treated as a single employing unit. The department may, of its own motion, cancel and terminate the effect of registrations for purposes of its accounting records in cases where it has found that employing units, duly registered as covered employers under the chapter, have died, ceased business or removed from the state without applying for termination of coverage, provided that the rights of claimants for benefits shall not be affected thereby.

An employing unit, not otherwise subject to this chapter, which files with the department its written election to become an employer subject thereto for not less than two (2) calendar years shall, with the written approval of such election by the department or the executive director, become an employer subject hereto to the same extent as all other employers as of the date stated in such approval, and shall cease to be subject hereto as of January 1 of any calendar year subsequent to such two (2) calendar years only if it files with the department, on or before the thirty-first day of May of such year, a written application for termination of coverage thereunder.

Any employing unit, for which services that do not constitute employment as defined in this chapter are performed, may file with the department a written election that all such services performed by individuals in its employ in one or more distinct establishments or places of business shall be deemed to constitute employment by an employer for all purposes of this chapter for not less than two (2) calendar years. Upon written approval of such election by the department, such services shall be deemed to constitute employment subject to this chapter from and after the date stated in such approval. Such services shall cease to be deemed employment subject hereto as of January 1 of any calendar year subsequent to such two (2) calendar years only if, prior to the thirty-first day of May of such year, such employing unit has filed with the department a written notice to that effect.

Prior to January 1, 1978, any political subdivision of this state may elect to cover under this chapter, for a period of not less than two (2) calendar years, services performed by employees in all of the hospitals and institutions of higher learning, as defined in Section 71-5-11, subsection M or N, operated by such political subdivision. Election is to be made by filing with the department a notice of such election at least thirty (30) days prior to the effective date of such election. The election may exclude any services described in Section 71-5-11, subsection I(5). Any political subdivision electing coverage under this subsection shall make payments in lieu of contributions with respect to benefits attributable to such employment as provided with respect to nonprofit organizations in subsections (b) and (c) of Section 71-5-357.

Prior to January 1, 1978, the provisions in Section 71-5-511, subsection (g) with respect to benefit rights based on service for state and nonprofit institutions of higher learning shall be applicable also to service covered by an election under this section.

Prior to January 1, 1978, the amounts required to be paid in lieu of contributions by any political subdivision under this section shall be billed and payment made as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of Section 71-5-357.

Prior to January 1, 1978, an election under this section, after having been in effect for not less than two (2) calendar years, may be terminated by filing with the department written notice not later than thirty (30) days preceding the last day of the calendar year in which the termination is to be effective. Such termination becomes effective as of the first day of the next ensuing calendar year with respect to services performed on and after that date.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7393; Laws, 1940, ch. 295; Laws, 1955, Ex. ch. 93, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 519, § 9; Laws, 1977, ch. 497, § 6; Laws, 2013, ch. 309, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved March 6, 2013).

§ 71-5-363.
Interest on past due contributions.

Contributions unpaid on the date on which they are due and payable shall bear interest at the rate of one percent (1%) per month from and after such date until payment plus accrued interest is received by the commission, provided that the commission may prescribe fair and reasonable general rules pursuant to which such interest shall not accrue during the first calendar year that any employer is subject to this chapter. Interest collected pursuant to this section shall be paid into the special employment security administration fund established by Section 71-5-114.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7423; Laws, 1940, ch. 295, § 12; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 9a; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 7a; Laws, 1968, ch. 561, § 3a; Laws, 1982, ch. 383, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1982.

§ 71-5-365.
Failure to make reports and pay contributions.

If any employer fails to make and file any report as and when required by the terms and provisions of this chapter or by any rule or regulation of the commission for the purpose of determining the amount of contributions due by him under this chapter, or if any report which has been filed is deemed by the executive director to be incorrect or insufficient, and such employer, after having been given notice by the executive director to file such report, or a corrected or sufficient report, as the case may be, shall fail to file such report within fifteen (15) days after the date of such notice, the executive director may (a) determine the amount of contributions due from such employer on the basis of such information as may be readily available to him, which said determination shall be prima facie correct, (b) assess such employer with the amount of contribution so determined, to which amount may be added and assessed by the executive director in his discretion, as damages, an amount equal to ten percent (10%) of said amount, and (c) immediately give notice to such employer of such determination, assessment, and damages, if any, added and assessed, demanding payment of same together with interest, as herein provided, on the amount of contributions from the date when same were due and payable. Such determination and assessment by the executive director shall be final at the expiration of fifteen (15) days from the date of such notice thereof demanding payment, unless:

Such employer shall have filed with the department a written protest and petition for a hearing, specifying his objections thereto. Upon receipt of such petition within the fifteen (15) days allowed, the department shall fix the time and place for a hearing and shall notify the petitioner thereof. At any hearing held before the department as herein provided, evidence may be offered to support such determination and assessment or to prove that it is incorrect, and the commission shall have all the power provided in Sections 71-5-137 and 71-5-139. Immediately after such hearing a final decision in the matter shall be made by the commission, and any contributions or deficiencies in contributions found and determined by the commission to be due shall be assessed and paid, together with interest, within fifteen (15) days after notice of such final decision and assessment, and demand for payment thereof by the department shall have been sent to such employer.

The department, in its discretion, determines on the basis of information submitted by the employer that such assessment should be amended and adjusted to reflect the correct amount of taxes.

Sixty (60) days after the due date of the contributions, together with interest and damages, or upon issuance of a warrant, whichever occurs first, the department, in its discretion, may assess an additional sum not exceeding one hundred percent (100%) of the amount of the unpaid contributions due as damages for failure to pay.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7424; Laws, 1940, ch. 295, § 12; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 9b; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 7b; Laws, 1968, ch. 561, § 3b; Laws, 1991, ch. 511, § 2; Laws, 1995, ch. 507, § 4; Laws, 2007, ch. 606, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 71-5-367.
Collection by warrant.

If an employer shall file a report in proper form and in proper amount, but shall fail to pay the amount of contributions shown to be due thereby at the time of such filing, or if an employer shall fail to pay any assessment as provided and made under Section 71-5-365 within fifteen (15) days after such assessment has become final as herein provided, the department may issue a warrant under its official seal, directed to the sheriff of any county of the state, commanding him to levy upon and sell the real and personal property of such employer as has defaulted in the payment of such contributions or assessments, which may be found within his county, for the payment of the amount thereof, together with interest, damages, if any, assessed for failure to make and file a report or a corrected or sufficient report, and an additional sum not exceeding one hundred percent (100%) of the amount of the unpaid contributions due, in the discretion of the department, as damages for failure to pay, if not already assessed under Section 71-5-365 and the costs of executing the warrant and to return such warrant to the department, and to pay to it the money collected by virtue thereof on the date specified therein. The department shall cause to be delivered to the clerk of the circuit court a copy of such warrant issued to the sheriff. Such clerk shall enter in the judgment roll, in the column for judgment debtors, the name of the employer mentioned in the warrant and, in appropriate columns, the amount of contributions, interest and damages for which the warrant is issued, a notation that the lien covers all previous, current and future periods for the life of the lien, and the date when such copy is filed. Thereupon the amount of such warrant so filed and entered shall become a lien upon the title to and interest in all real and personal property, including choses in action against negotiable instruments not past due, of the employer against whom the warrant is issued in the same manner as a judgment duly enrolled in the office of such clerk. Any such liens shall cover all contributions, interest and damages owed to the department from previous, current and future periods until the expiration of such lien or until the amount of the lien is fully satisfied. Such judgment shall not be a lien upon the property of the employer for a period of more than seven (7) years from the date of filing of the notice of the tax lien for failure to pay contributions, damages and interest unless action be brought thereon before the expiration of such time or unless the department refiles such notice of tax lien before the expiration of such time. The judgment shall be a lien upon the property of the employer for a period of seven (7) years from the date of refiling such notice of tax lien unless action be brought thereon before the expiration of such time or unless the department refiles such notice of tax lien before the expiration of such time. There shall be no limit upon the number of times the department may refile notices of tax liens. The sheriff shall proceed upon the warrant in the same manner and with like effect as that provided by law in respect to executions issued against property upon judgments or in attachment proceedings of a court of record, and the remedies by garnishment shall apply; and for his services in executing the warrant the sheriff shall be entitled to the same fees, which he may collect in the same manner.

The department may elect to issue the warrant directly to the circuit clerk of any county of this state for enrollment upon the judgment rolls of the county. In such case, the clerk shall enter in the judgment roll, in the column for judgment debtors, the name of the employer mentioned in the warrant and, in appropriate columns, the amount of contributions, interest and damages for which the warrant is issued, a notation that the lien covers all previous, current and future periods for the life of the lien, and the date when such warrant is filed. The lien shall have the same effect and remedies as that provided by law in respect to executions issued against property upon judgments or in attachment proceedings of a court of record, and the remedies by garnishment shall apply.

All warrants issued by the department for the collection of any unemployment tax or for an overpayment of benefits imposed by statute and collected by the department shall be used to levy on salaries, compensation or other monies due the delinquent employer or claimant. No such warrant shall be issued until after the delinquent employer or claimant has exhausted all appeal rights associated with the debt. The warrants shall be served by mail or by delivery by an agent of the department on the person or entity responsible or liable for the payment of the monies due the delinquent employer or claimant. Once served, the employer or other person owing compensation due the delinquent employer or claimant shall pay the monies over to the department in complete or partial satisfaction of the liability. An answer shall be made within thirty (30) days after service of the warrant in the form and manner determined satisfactory by the department. Failure to pay the money over to the department as required by this section shall result in the served party being personally liable for the full amount of the monies owed and the levy and collection process may be issued against the party in the same manner as other debts owed to the department. Except as otherwise provided by this section, the answer, the amount payable under the warrant and the obligation of the payor to continue payment shall be governed by the garnishment laws of this state but shall be payable to the department.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7425; Laws, 1940, ch. 295, § 12; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 9c; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 7c; Laws, 1968, ch. 561, § 3c; Laws, 1995, ch. 507, § 5; Laws, 1996, ch. 464, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 508, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 309, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved March 6, 2013).

§ 71-5-369.
Jeopardy assessment and warrant.

If the commission has just cause to believe and does believe that the collection of contributions from an employer will be jeopardized by delay, it may assess such contributions immediately, together with interest and other amounts provided by this chapter, and may immediately issue a jeopardy warrant under its official seal, directed to the sheriff of any county of said state. The sheriff shall, immediately upon receipt of such jeopardy warrant, file with the clerk of the circuit court of his county a copy thereof, and thereafter both the clerk and the sheriff shall proceed in accordance with the provisions of Section 71-5-367.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7426; Laws, 1940, ch. 295, § 12; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 9d; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 7d; Laws, 1968, ch. 561, § 3d, eff from and after July 1, 1968.